District of Columbia statutes.
16-4213

Application to existing agreements or referrals.

On or after January 1, 2007, this chapter governs a mediation pursuant to a referral or an agreement to mediate, whenever made.

Apr. 4, 2006, D.C. Law 16-87, § 2(b), 53 DCR 1075
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 17 of the Uniform Mediation Act.